Washington statutes.
RCW 5.44.040

Certified copies of public records as evidence.

Copies of all records and documents on record or on file in the offices of the various departments of the United States and of this state or any other state or territory of the United States or any federally recognized Indian tribe, when duly certified by the respective officers having by law the custody thereof, under their respective seals where such officers have official seals, must be admitted in evidence in the courts of this state.

[ 2019 c 39 s 2; 1991 c 59 s 1; 1891 c 19 s 16; Code 1881 s 432; 1854 p 195 s 336; RRS s 1257.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. ER 803; CR 44(a)(1).